Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3185.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; HMONG COMMUNITY CENTER.new text end new text begin $3,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to Hmong 18 Council, Inc., a 501(c)(3) nonprofit corporation, to predesign, design, construct, renovate, furnish, and equip the Hmong Community Center in the city of St. Paul. The center will serve Hmong families and the community. It will be a community space and a hub for culturally specific resources and social services. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until the project is completed or abandoned, subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.642, and is in addition to the appropriation made in Laws 2023, chapter 71, article 1, section 14, subdivision 74. new text end